Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-2741
Fees, charges, costs, fines; remittance.

(1) The department shall remit all fees, charges, and costs collected by the department pursuant to the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act to the State Treasurer for credit to the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund.

(2) The department shall remit fines collected under the act to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 41;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 46.